District of Columbia statutes.
29-703.02

No agency power of limited partner as limited partner.

(a)

A limited partner is not an agent of a limited partnership solely by reason of being a limited partner.

(b)

A person’s status as a limited partner does not prevent or restrict the law, other than in this title, from imposing liability on a limited partnership because of the person’s conduct.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(B), 59 DCR 13171

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Effect of Amendments

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 302 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.